New York, session 2025-2026, S6849.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph 8 of subdivision (a) of section 31.04 of the 2 mental hygiene law, as added by section 1 of part Z of chapter 57 of the 3 laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 4 8. establishing a schedule of fees for the purpose of processing 5 applications for the issuance of operating certificates. All fees pursu- 6 ant to this section shall be payable to the [office for deposit into the 7 general] mental illness anti-stigma fund established pursuant to section 8 ninety-five-h of the state finance law. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08458-01-5